Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-169
Individual; threat to health or safety; unable to perform duties; effect.

Actions otherwise prohibited by subsections (1) and (3) of section 20-168 shall not constitute a violation of the requirements of such section if the individual suffering from or suspected of suffering from human immunodeficiency virus infection or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome poses a direct threat to the health or safety of himself, herself, or other individuals or is unable to perform the duties of the job he or she is applying for or is employed to perform.

Laws 1990, LB 465, § 2.